District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Architect and Engineer Good Samaritan Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Subchapter I-B of Chapter 28 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official
Code is amended as follows:
(a) Section 47-2853.01 is amended by adding a new paragraph (1A) to read as follows:
“(1A) “Built environment” means the human-constructed surroundings that
support human activities, including buildings, transport systems, and landscapes.”.
(b) Part C is amended as follows:
(1) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read
as follows:
“47-2853.69. Limited civil liability for voluntary practice of architecture at scene of life-
threatening emergency in the built environment.”.
(2) A new section 47-2853.69 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-2853.69. Limited civil liability for voluntary practice of architecture at scene of
life-threatening emergency in the built environment.
“Any person with a valid license as an architect shall not be liable, in the absence of gross
negligence or willful misconduct, for any civil damages for acts or omissions resulting from
rendering assistance through the practice of architecture at the scene of, or in connection with, a
life-threatening emergency in the built environment; provided, that the person acted:
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(1) During a public emergency declared by the Mayor pursuant to § 7-2304(a),
or within 90 days following the end of the public emergency declared by the Mayor pursuant to §
7-2304(a), at the scene of the life-threatening emergency in the built environment;
“(2) In good faith and without compensation;
“(3) At the direction or request of, or with the approval of, a federal or District
official reasonably believed by the person to be acting in an official capacity; and
“(4) After having completed a training program that uses the California
Governor’s Office Of Emergency Services Safety Assessment Program to provide licensed
architects the ability to assist local governments in safety evaluation of the built environment in
the aftermath of a life-threatening emergency in the built environment.”.
(c) Part H is amended as follows:
(1) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read
as follows:
“47-2853.115. Limited civil liability for voluntary practice of land surveying at scene of
life-threatening emergency in the built environment.”.
(2) A new section 47-2853.115 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-2853.115. Limited civil liability for voluntary practice of land surveying at scene
of life-threatening emergency in the built environment.
“Any person with a valid license as a professional land surveyor shall not be liable, in the
absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct, for any civil damages for acts or omissions
resulting from rendering assistance through the practice of land surveying at the scene of, or in
connection with, a life-threatening emergency in the built environment; provided, that the person
acted:
“(1) During a public emergency declared by the Mayor pursuant § 7-2304(a), or
within 90 days following the end of the public emergency declared by the Mayor pursuant to § 7-
2304(a), at the scene of the life-threatening emergency in the built environment;
“(2) In good faith and without compensation;
“(3) At the direction or request of, or with the approval of, a federal or District
official reasonably believed by the person to be acting in an official capacity; and
“(4) After having completed a training program that uses the California
Governor’s Office Of Emergency Services Safety Assessment Program to provide licensed
professional land surveyors the ability to assist local governments in safety evaluation of the
built environment in the aftermath of a life-threatening emergency in the built environment.”.
(d) Part J is amended as follows:
(1) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read
as follows:
“47-2853.134. Limited civil liability for voluntary practice of engineering at scene of life-
threatening emergency in the built environment.”.
(2) A new section 47-2853.134 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-2853.134. Limited civil liability for voluntary practice of engineering at scene of
life-threatening emergency in the built environment.
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“Any person with a valid license as a professional engineer shall not be liable, in the
absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct, for any civil damages for acts or omissions
resulting from rendering assistance through the practice of engineering at the scene of, or in
connection with, a life-threatening emergency in the built environment; provided, that the person
acted:
“(1) During a public emergency declared by the Mayor pursuant § 7-2304(a), or
within 90 days following the end of the public emergency declared by the Mayor pursuant to § 7-
2304(a), at the scene of the life-threatening emergency in the built environment;
“(2) In good faith and without compensation;
“(3) At the direction or request of or with the approval of a federal or District
official reasonably believed by the person to be acting in an official capacity; and
“(4) After having completed a training program that uses the California
Governor’s Office Of Emergency Services Safety Assessment Program to provide licensed
professional engineers the ability to assist local governments in safety evaluation of the built
environment in the aftermath of a life-threatening emergency in the built environment.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
4